Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-504
Secretary of State; bills not signed or returned to Legislature by Governor; authentication.

Whenever any bill which shall have passed the Legislature and shall not be returned by the Governor or filed with his objections in the office of the Secretary of State, as required by Article IV, section 15, Constitution of Nebraska, it shall be the duty of the Secretary of State to authenticate the same by a certificate thereon to the following effect, as the case may be: This bill having remained with the Governor five days, Sunday excepted, the Legislature being in session, the Governor having failed to return this bill to the Legislature during its session, and having failed to file it in my office with his objections within five days after adjournment of the Legislature, it has thereby become a law.

Witness my hand this ........ day of ........, A.D., ........... .

Laws 1877, § 6, p. 196;

R.S.1913, § 5570;

C.S.1922, § 4874;

C.S.1929, § 84-502;

Laws 1939, c. 136, § 1, p. 582;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 84-502;

R.S.1943, § 84-504.